New York, session 2025-2026, A10202.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 242 of the mili- 2 tary law, as amended by chapter 406 of the laws of 2017, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (a) Every public officer or employee shall be paid [his or her] their 5 salary or other compensation as such public officer or employee for any 6 and all periods of absence while engaged in the performance of ordered 7 military duty, and while going to and returning from such duty, not 8 exceeding a total of [thirty] sixty days or [twenty-two] fifty-two work- 9 ing days, whichever is greater, in any one calendar year and not exceed- 10 ing [thirty] sixty days or [twenty-two] fifty-two working days, whichev- 11 er is greater, in any one continuous period of such absence. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07300-01-5